Tennessee, session 114, HB0456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-107(c)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(2) The registry of election finance shall, by rule promulgated in accordance with
the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, enumerate a
nonexclusive listing of examples of the various categories of contributions that constitute
"in-kind contributions" requiring disclosure. The registry shall provide a copy of such rule
to each member of the general assembly at the beginning of each yearly session and
each candidate for state office within one (1) week of the candidate certifying a treasurer
with the registry. Any changes or revisions to the rules must be promulgated pursuant to
§ 4-55-103(1).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0456
001899
- 1 -